District of Columbia statutes.
7-863.03a

Transfer from Department of Human Services; continuation.

(a)

All positions, personnel, property, records, and unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds available or to be made available to the Department of Human Services that support functions related to the responsibilities of the Early Care and Education Administration and the Early Intervention Program and all of the powers, duties, and functions delegated to the Department of Human Services concerning the establishment, development, and institution of functions related to the Early Care and Education Administration and the Early Intervention Program are transferred to the Office of the State Superintendent of Education, established by § 38-2601. The transfer shall be implemented in accordance with the transition plan required by § 38-2605.01.

(b)

All rules, orders, obligations, determinations, grants, contracts, licenses, and agreements of the Board of Education, the District of Columbia Public Schools, the Department of Human Services, or the University of the District of Columbia relating to functions transferred to the Office of the State Superintendent of Education under subsection (a) of this section shall remain in effect according to their terms until lawfully amended, repealed, or modified.

History

Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-353, § 503a
as added June 12, 2007, D.C. Law 17-9, § 304(b), 54 DCR 4102
July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-202, § 602, 55 DCR 6297

Section References

This section is referenced in § 38-2605.01.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-202 substituted “institution of functions related to the Early Care and Education Administration and the Early Intervention Program” for “institution of functions related to the Early Intervention Program”.